Tennessee statutes. Title 53 Food, Drugs And Cosmetics
Part 1

General Provisions

53-3-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Dairy Law of the State of Tennessee.”

Acts 1970, ch. 577, § 2; T.C.A., § 52-301.

Law Reviews.

An Examination of the Tennessee Law of Administrative Procedure (George Street Boone), 1 Vand. L. Rev. 339.

Attorney General Opinions. Owner's use of milk and licensing of the sale of eggs. OAG 12-04, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 2 (1/13/12).

Comparative Legislation. Dairy products:

Ala. Code § 2-13-1 et seq.

Ark. Code § 20-59-101 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. § 26-2-230 et seq.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 217C.010 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. § 75-31-65 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 196.520 et seq.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 106-266.6 et seq.

Va. Code § 3.1-420 et seq.

Collateral References. 35 Am. Jur. 2d Food § 47 et seq.

36A C.J.S. Food § 29 et seq.

Constitutionality of regulations as to milk. 18 A.L.R. 235, 42 A.L.R. 556, 58 A.L.R. 672, 80 A.L.R. 1225, 101 A.L.R. 64, 110 A.L.R. 644, 119 A.L.R. 243, 155 A.L.R. 1383.

Construction and application of regulations as to milk. 122 A.L.R. 1062.

Pasteurization, validity of statute or ordinance requiring. 10 A.L.R. 132, 18 A.L.R. 246, 42 A.L.R. 558, 58 A.L.R. 673, 110 A.L.R. 650, 119 A.L.R. 243, 155 A.L.R. 1396.

“Public,” what amounts to sale of milk to, within statutory regulations as to milk. 111 A.L.R. 725.

Validity of municipal ordinance imposing labeling requirements affecting outside producers of milk to be sold in city. 14 A.L.R.2d 103.

Food
1.8 et seq., 3, 4.5 et seq., 5, 6, 11 et seq.

53-3-102. Construction of chapter.

The word “shall” is mandatory, and the word “may” is permissive.

Wherever a tolerance is allowed, it shall apply only to a tolerance as to composition and not to weight, unless specifically stated.

Whenever any reference is made to any section in this chapter or to any other law, the reference shall apply to all amendments and additions to the section or other law.

Acts 1970, ch. 577, § 2; T.C.A., § 52-302.

Code Commission Notes. The definitions for “person” and “sell” were transferred to § 53-3-103 by the code commission in 2008.

53-3-103. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of agriculture or the person authorized to enforce this chapter;

“Dairy products” means pure, clean and wholesome milk, cream, pure milk fat, butter, buttermilk, cheese, ice cream, ice cream mix, ice milk, ice milk mix, ice or ice sherbet, evaporated milk, skimmed milk, condensed milk, sweetened condensed milk, condensed skimmed milk, sweetened condensed skimmed milk, dried milk, dried skimmed milk, any derivatives of milk or combination of products made from milk;

“Dairy products plants” means all places where dairy products are packaged, processed or manufactured;

“Department” means the Tennessee department of agriculture;

“Official methods of analysis” means, for the purpose of determining the bacteriological, chemical or physical constituents in milk, dairy products and trade products as well as organoleptic tests and examinations for extraneous matter or direct and indirect additives and for enforcing the requirements of this chapter, The Methods of Analysis – Tenth Edition, and subsequent editions adopted by the Association of Official Analytical Chemists and Standard Methods for the Examination of Dairy Products – Twelfth Edition, and subsequent editions adopted by the American Public Health Association, and approved methods in a journal of these associations published prior to publication in the book of methods or other methods the commissioner may approve;

“Person” includes an individual, firm, corporation, company or association;

“Receiving plant” means all places where dairy products or milk products not in consumer packages are received on consignment or otherwise, stored or transported, but where packaging, processing or manufacturing does not occur;

“Sell” includes “offer for sale,” “expose for sale,” “have in possession for sale,” “exchange,” “barter,” or “trade”;

“Trade products” means any products made in semblance of dairy products that may be used as a substitute for dairy products; and

“Trade products plants” means all places where trade products are packaged, processed or manufactured.

Acts 1970, ch. 577, § 2; T.C.A., § 52-303; T.C.A., § 53-3-102(a)(1), (2).

Code Commission Notes.

The definitions for “person” and “sell” were transferred from § 53-3-102 to this section by the code commission in 2008.

53-3-104. Authority and powers of the commissioner — Special provisions for trade products — Rules and regulations.

The commissioner has the authority to define all varieties and types of dairy products and trade products.

The commissioner is further empowered to inspect and establish rules and regulations governing the production, storing, transportation, handling, processing, packaging and labeling of any and all dairy products and trade products.

The product name for any trade product shall include the word “imitation” followed immediately by the name of the dairy product in semblance of which the trade product is made; further, the word “imitation” shall be in print of the same size as the name of the dairy product it precedes.

The commissioner is further authorized to delegate the commissioner's authority under subsection (a) to any individual the commissioner deems qualified to assist the commissioner in the administration of this chapter.

In the performance of the commissioner's official duties, the commissioner is authorized and empowered to enter during business hours all creameries, cheese factories, milk depots, milk plants, ice cream factories, milk condensaries, and similar plants processing or manufacturing trade products for the purpose of executing this chapter.

The rules and regulations promulgated by the commissioner under the authority of this chapter shall comply with the following requirements:

A copy of the proposed rules and regulations shall be mailed to every licensed processor and manufacturer of dairy products or trade products and all milk producer cooperatives operating within the state;

The notice shall specify a time, no sooner than fifteen (15) days after the date of the notice, and the place for a hearing and shall allow for written objections to be filed five (5) days prior to the hearing;

After the hearing, based on the evidence, any proposed rules and regulations shall be submitted by the commissioner to the attorney general and reporter for approval as to form and legality;

Once the rules and regulations have been officially adopted and filed with the secretary of state, they shall become enforceable thirty (30) days after adoption and filing, and a copy of the official rules and regulations shall be mailed to all licensed processors and manufacturers of dairy products or trade products, and all milk producer cooperatives operating in the state. Also, copies shall be mailed to all registrants and licensed distributors of dairy products or trade products in the state;

Proposals to promulgate rules and regulations may be made by the commissioner or by any other interested person. If any interested person other than the commissioner proposes rules and regulations, the person shall file an application in writing with the commissioner, giving the person's proposed rules and regulations, together with a brief statement of the reasons and needs for promulgating the rules and regulations. The commissioner may institute a hearing, as provided in this chapter, when the commissioner deems, after investigation and consideration of the proposal submitted by another interested person, that the proposal seems reasonable and justified or notify the person that the person's application has been denied and the grounds for the denial; and

Any revision, amendment or termination of existing rules and regulations shall follow the same procedure as set forth in this section.

Notwithstanding any rule promulgated under subsection (a) and except as provided in subdivision (e)(2), the department shall not regulate the production of unpasteurized butter provided that it is produced:

In a facility separate from production of pasteurized products;

Solely for intrastate commerce; and

By a person licensed by the department as a dairy plant.

Any unpasteurized butter sold pursuant to this subsection (e) must bear the following warning on the principal display panel or panels of the label:

WARNING: This product has not been inspected by the Department of Agriculture. Raw (unpasteurized) butter may contain disease-causing micro-organisms. Persons at highest risk of disease from these organisms include newborns and infants; the elderly; pregnant women; those taking corticosteroids, antibiotics, or antacids; and those having chronic illnesses or other conditions that weaken their immunity.

Acts 1970, ch. 577, § 2; 1981, ch. 29, § 2; 1981, ch. 326, § 1; T.C.A., § 52-304; Acts 2019, ch. 258, § 1.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added (e).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 258, § 2. April 30, 2019

Cross-References. Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, title 4, ch. 5.

Law Reviews.

Criminal Law and Procedure (Robert E. Kendrick), 14 Vand. L. Rev. 1220.

53-3-105. Samplers and testers licenses.

Samplers License and Fee. Every person receiving or buying milk or cream on the basis of its chemical or physical constituents shall be, or have in the person's employ, in or on each milk transport tank truck, a licensed milk sampler or tester. Application to become a licensed sampler shall be made to the commissioner on forms the commissioner may prescribe. The license shall expire on July 1 of each succeeding year. In order to qualify for a license, the applicant shall satisfy to the commissioner, either by a written examination or otherwise, that the applicant is honest and competent to do sampling work. An identification card stating the applicant's name and address and bearing the same number as the applicant's license shall be issued to the applicant at the time the applicant's license is issued and shall be carried on the applicant's person at all times while on duty. The annual license fee for a sampler shall be set by rule pursuant to § 43-1-703.

Milk Testers License and Fee. Every person receiving or buying milk or cream on the basis of its chemical or physical constituents shall be, or have in the person's employ, a licensed milk tester to make the official analysis; and no other person shall be allowed to make the tests in any creamery, cheese factory, milk depot, milk plant, ice cream factory, cream station, milk condensery, or similar plant where milk or cream is bought or received on a basis of its chemical or physical constituents. Application to become a licensed milk tester shall be made to the commissioner on forms the commissioner may prescribe. If the applicant is found upon examination to be qualified and competent, the commissioner shall issue a license to the applicant. Licenses issued in accordance with this section shall be posted conspicuously in the tester's place of business. Licensed testers are also qualified and permitted to act as samplers. The annual license fee for a tester shall be set by rule pursuant to § 43-1-703.

Acts 1970, ch. 577, § 2; T.C.A., § 52-305; Acts 2002, ch. 640, §§ 23, 24; 2015, ch. 485, § 33.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment in (a), deleted the former third sentence, which read: “An annual license fee of eight dollars ($8.00) shall be required of each person who qualifies for a license.”, added “and” preceding “address and bearing” in the penultimate sentence and added the last sentence; rewrote (b), which read: “Every person receiving or buying milk or cream on the basis of its chemical or physical constituents shall be, or have in the person's employ, a licensed milk tester to make the official analysis; and no other person shall be allowed to make the tests in any creamery, cheese factory, milk depot, milk plant, ice cream factory, cream station, milk condensary, or similar plant where milk or cream is bought or received on a basis of its chemical or physical constituents. Application to become a licensed milk tester shall be made to the commissioner on forms the commissioner may prescribe. All licenses shall expire on the next succeeding July 1 and the fee shall be eight dollars ($8.00). The required fee shall accompany the application, and if the applicant is found upon examination to be qualified and competent, the commissioner shall issue a license to the applicant. Licenses thus issued shall be posted conspicuously in the tester's place of business. Licensed testers are also qualified and permitted to act as samplers.” ; and deleted (c), which read: “(c)(1)(A) In the event the commissioner has reason to believe the holder of a sampler's or tester's license is guilty of violating any provision of this chapter or is dishonest or incompetent, the commissioner shall conduct a hearing to determine the revocation of a sampler's or tester's license.“(B) A ten-day notice shall be given and the hearing conducted at Ellington Agricultural Center, Nashville.“(C) Following the hearing, the commissioner may:“(i) Permanently revoke the license; or“(ii) Suspend the license for a definite period of time.“(D) The commissioner's decision may be appealed to the chancery court of Davidson County.“(2)(A) If, after revocation of the licensee's license, the licensee complies with the requirements of the law as provided and makes manifest, in writing, the licensee's intentions to immediately observe the law, the commissioner may reissue a new license upon payment of the required fees.“(B) Reapplication may be made on forms provided by the commissioner, except in no case will reissuance of a license be allowed where the licensee has been found to be incompetent, dishonest or guilty of any fraudulent practices.“(3) The commissioner has the power to subpoena any persons or records incident to the hearing and further to administer oaths to those giving evidence.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 485, § 41. July 1, 2015; May 20, 2015, for the purpose of promulgating rules.

53-3-106. Manufacturer, plant and distributor licenses.

Frozen Dessert Manufacturer's License. For purposes of licensing under this chapter, a dairy products plant that manufactures or packages frozen desserts, such as ice cream, ice cream mix, ice milk, ice milk mix, ice, or ice sherbets, or any trade product made in semblance of these products or that may be used as a substitute for these products, shall be licensed as a frozen dessert manufacturer. Any person making frozen dessert for sale shall be required to procure from the commissioner an annual frozen dessert manufacturer's license for each location or plant where frozen dessert is manufactured. The license fee for a frozen dessert manufacturer's license shall be set by rule pursuant to § 43-1-703.

Dairy Plant or Trade Products Plant License, or Both. A dairy products plant or trade products plant that manufactures, processes, or packages any dairy products or trade products other than those listed as frozen desserts in subdivision (a)(1) shall be required to have a dairy plant license. Every person buying or receiving milk, cream, or dairy products from another for manufacturing, processing, or packaging shall be required to procure from the commissioner an annual dairy plant or trade products plant license for each location where milk, cream, dairy products, or trade products are received for the purpose of manufacturing, processing, or packaging. The license fees for a plant license shall be set by rule pursuant to § 43-1-703.

Receiving Plant License. Any plant where fluid milk or cream not in consumer packages is received on consignment or otherwise, stored, or transported, but where packaging, processing, or manufacturing does not occur, shall be required to have an annual receiving plant license for each location or plant where milk or cream is received. The license fee for a receiving plant license shall be set by rule pursuant to § 43-1-703.

Distributor's License. Every person buying or receiving from another person dairy products or frozen desserts or trade products, as defined in this chapter for the purpose of resale, shall be required to procure from the commissioner an annual distributor's license; provided, that no distributor's license shall be required of any license holder, licensed under this section, that delivers or distributes its own products. No distributor's license shall be required of any person who sells dairy products or trade products in hotels, restaurants, retail stores, or supermarkets if the dairy products or trade products have been delivered to the location of the hotel, restaurant, retail store, or supermarket by a licensed frozen dessert manufacturer, licensed dairy plant or trade product plant operator, or licensed distributor. No distributor's license shall be required of a receiving plant. The license fee for a distributor's license shall be set by rule pursuant to § 43-1-703.

Application for the license provided for in this section shall be made on forms prescribed by the commissioner and shall be accompanied by the required fee.

The license is to be issued by the commissioner after inspection and approval by the commissioner of the sanitary conditions of the place of business of the applicant.

Persons buying or receiving milk or cream from another, for sale or manufacture on the basis of the chemical or physical constituents in the milk or cream, or manufacturing or offering for sale dairy products or trade products as defined in this chapter, shall comply with and be governed by this chapter and all rules and regulations issued by the commissioner under authority of this chapter.

All licenses provided for in this section shall become due on July 1 of each year, and shall not be transferable.

The commissioner, in issuing or renewing a license, shall give equal consideration to the location and person requesting the license, and the commissioner shall refuse to issue a license if, for any reason, in the commissioner's opinion, the location is unsatisfactory or the person is unqualified.

Acts 1970, ch. 577, § 2; T.C.A. § 52-306; Acts 1997, ch. 75, § 1; 2002, ch. 640, §§ 25-28; 2015, ch. 485, § 34.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment rewrote (a) which read: “(a)(1) Frozen Dessert Manufacturer's License. For purposes of licensing under this chapter, a dairy products plant manufacturing or packaging frozen desserts, such as ice cream, ice cream mix, ice milk, ice milk mix, ice or ice sherbets or any trade product made in semblance of these products or that may be used as a substitute for these products, shall be licensed as a frozen dessert manufacturer. Any person making frozen dessert for sale shall be required to procure from the commissioner an annual frozen dessert manufacturers license for each location or plant where frozen dessert is manufactured. The method for determining the license fee for a frozen dessert manufacturers license shall be based on the gallons of mix used the previous calendar year. In the event a frozen dessert manufacturer does not have a year's history, the license fee shall be based on an estimate determined by the commissioner.“Up to and including — 20,000 Gallons $ 32.00“20,001 — 100,000 Gallons 80.00“100,001 — 500,000 Gallons 160.00“500,001 — 1,000,000 Gallons 240.00“1,000,001 — 2,000,000 Gallons 320.00“2,000,001 or more Gallons 400.00“(2) Dairy Plant or Trade Products Plant License, or Both. A dairy products plant or trade products plant manufacturing, processing or packaging any dairy products or trade products other than those listed in subdivision (a)(1) as frozen desserts shall be required to have a dairy plant license. Every person buying or receiving from another milk, cream or dairy products for manufacturing, processing or packaging shall be required to procure from the commissioner an annual dairy plant or trade products plant license for each location where milk, cream, dairy products or trade products are received for the purpose of manufacturing, processing or packaging. Methods for determining license fees for a plant license shall be as follows:“(A) For a plant purchasing fluid milk, the fee shall be based on pounds of fluid milk received the previous calendar year. In the event the plant does not have a year's history, the license fee shall be based on an estimate determined by the commissioner.“Up to and including — 10,000,000 lbs. Milk $ 40.00“10,000,001 — 25,000,000 lbs. Milk 80.00“25,000,001 — 50,000,000 lbs. Milk 160.00“50,000,001 — 75,000,000 lbs. Milk 240.00“75,000,001 — 100,000,000 lbs. Milk 320.00“100,000,001 or more lbs. 400.00“(B) For a plant receiving cream, the fee shall be based on pounds of butterfat (BF) received the previous calendar year. In the event the plant does not have a year's history, the license fee shall be based on an estimate by the commissioner.“Up to and including — 400,000 lbs. $ 40.00“400,001 — 1,000,000 lbs. 80.00“1,000,001 — 2,000,000 lbs. 160.00“2,000,001 — 3,000,000 lbs. 240.00“3,000,001 — 4,000,000 lbs. 320.00“4,000,001 or more lbs. 400.00“(C) If a dairy products or trade products plant receives both fluid milk and cream, the license fee shall be determined by combining the fees due under subdivisions (a)(2)(A) and (B).“(D) In the event any dairy products or trade products plant as defined in this chapter does not use fluid milk or cream as a principal ingredient of the product it manufactures, then the plant license shall be based on pounds of finished product sold and fees determined by schedule under subdivision (a)(2)(A).“(3) Receiving Plant License. Any plant where fluid milk or cream not in consumer packages is received on consignment or otherwise, stored, or transported, but where packaging, processing or manufacturing does not occur, shall be required to have an annual receiving plant license for each location or plant where milk or cream is received. Methods for determining the license fee for a receiving plant license shall be as follows:“(A) The license fee for a receiving plant receiving fluid milk shall be one half (½) the fee based on the schedule under subdivision (a)(2)(A);“(B) The license fee for a receiving plant receiving cream shall be one half (½) the fee based on the schedule under subdivision (a)(2)(B); and“(C) If a receiving plant receives both fluid milk and cream, the license fee shall be one half (½) the fee based on the combination of schedules under subdivisions (a)(2)(A) and (B).“(4) Distributor's License. Every person buying or receiving from another person dairy products or frozen desserts or trade products, as defined in this chapter for the purpose of resale, shall be required to purchase from the commissioner an annual distributor's license; provided, that no distributor's license shall be required of the holder of a frozen dessert manufacturer's license or dairy plant or trade products plant license delivering or distributing their own products, or persons selling dairy products or trade products in hotels, restaurants, retail stores or supermarkets if the dairy products or trade products have been delivered to the location of the hotel, restaurant, retail store, or supermarket by a licensed frozen dessert manufacturer, licensed dairy plant or trade product plant operator, or a licensed distributor. No distributor's license shall be required of a receiving plant. The license fee for a distributor's license shall be forty dollars ($40.00) per truck up to a maximum fee of four hundred dollars ($400).”

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 485, § 41. July 1, 2015; May 20, 2015, for the purpose of promulgating rules.

Cross-References. Processors and distributors to file corporate surety bonds, § 53-3-118.

53-3-107. [Repealed.]

Acts 1970, ch. 577, § 2; T.C.A., § 52-307; Acts 1997, ch. 75, §§ 2, 3; 2002, ch. 640, § 29; repealed by Acts 2015, ch. 485, § 35, effective July 1, 2015.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 53-3-107 concerned the registration, labeling and advertising of products.

53-3-108. Revocation of licenses and registrations — Reissuance.

The commissioner has the authority to revoke any license or registration certificate for violation of any section of this chapter. Upon information received, the commissioner shall, by written notice, establish a hearing for the licensee or registrant. The hearing shall be held within fifteen (15) days from the date of the mailing of the notice. If, after the hearing, the commissioner revokes the license, then the right of appeal is reserved to the licensee or registrant. The commissioner has the power to subpoena any persons or records incident to the hearing and further to administer oaths to those giving evidence. In case of contumacy or refusal to obey a subpoena issued to any person, any circuit or chancery court of this state within the county in which the investigation is carried on, or in which the person guilty of contumacy or refusal to obey is found or resides or transacts business, or has the person's principal place of business, upon application by the commissioner, shall have jurisdiction to issue to the person an order requiring the person to appear before the commissioner at a specified time and place and then and there produce evidence, if so ordered, or there to give testimony touching the matter under investigation or subject of inquiry, or answer any question, and any failure to obey the order of the court may be punished by the court as a contempt of the order as provided by law. A court reporter shall be in attendance at all revocation hearings other than testers or samplers.

The action of the commissioner may be reviewed by petition for common law writ of certiorari addressed to the circuit or chancery court of Davidson County, and the petition shall be filed within ten (10) days from the date of the order of revocation issued by the commissioner. Upon the grant of the writ of certiorari, the commissioner shall certify to the court a complete transcript of the proceedings instituted before the commissioner. This certified transcript shall constitute the whole record, and no additional proof or evidence shall be considered by the circuit or chancery court of Davidson County. The decision of the commissioner shall remain final until the matter has been finally resolved by the courts.

If, after revocation of the licensee's or registrant's license or registration, the licensee or registrant complies with the requirements of the law as provided and makes manifest, in writing, the licensee's or registrant's intentions to immediately observe the law, upon payment of the cost of the hearing, the commissioner may reissue a new license or registration certificate upon payment of the required fees. Reapplication may be made on forms provided by the commissioner, except in no case will reissuance of a license or registration certificate be allowed where fraudulent manipulation of tests or records is shown.

It is the expressed intent of this section to preserve any appeal set forth in parts 2 and 3 of this chapter and to leave the appeal set forth in parts 2 and 3 of this chapter unaffected.

Acts 1970, ch. 577, § 2; T.C.A., § 52-308.

Cross-References. Court's power to punish for contempt, § 16-1-103.

Punishment for contempt, title 29, ch. 9.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U. L. Rev. 241.

53-3-109. Duties of licensees and registrants.

Every person subject to a license or registration certificate under this chapter shall annually, on February 1, report to the commissioner, on blanks furnished by the commissioner, the location of the business and description of the premises, the name of the owner and manager, the amounts of the different dairy products or trade products processed, manufactured or distributed by the person during the year ending December 31 preceding, and other reasonable information the commissioner may prescribe.

Every person licensed to buy milk and cream under this chapter shall keep, for a period of three (3) years, a legible record of all purchases made at the place where purchases are made, showing the weight of the purchases and test of the milk and cream at the place of purchase on the chemical or physical constituents and the total amount paid for the milk and cream.

When a patron or producer is paid for milk or cream, a record shall be given the patron or producer showing the total amount paid and all factors, including gallons or weight, test, and price per unit used in arriving at the total amount paid to the patron or producer. This record shall also show any and all deductions made in determining the patron's or producer's net settlement. A duplicate copy of the record required by this subsection (b) or a duplicate of the check, where the required information is carried on the check, shall be kept on file for a period of three (3) years.

If and when grades of milk and cream are established, the grades of the milk and cream shall be included in the purchase report and patron's and producer's record.

It is unlawful not to keep these records or to falsify them.

Acts 1970, ch. 577, § 2; T.C.A., § 52-309.

Cross-References. Processors and distributors to file corporate surety bonds, § 53-3-118.

53-3-110. Only approved standard scales, weights, measures and tests to be used.

Every person or agent for any person, buying milk or cream on the basis of its weights or chemical or physical constituents, as determined by an approved test, shall use only standard scales and measures approved by the commissioner and only standard weights and tests, bottles and pipettes approved by the commissioner.

It is unlawful for any person to sell the articles listed in subsection (a) to anyone to be used for the purposes stated in subsection (a), unless they have been approved, as required in subsection (a), by the commissioner.

Acts 1970, ch. 577, § 2; T.C.A., § 52-310.

53-3-111. Tests to settle disputes between buyers and sellers.

The commissioner is authorized and empowered to make tests that are necessary to settle disputes when called on by either a buyer or seller of milk, cream, or other dairy products, or trade products where disputes arise over dissatisfaction regarding weights or tests of dairy products.

The tests made by the commissioner shall be prima facie correct, and shall be taken as a basis of settlement in the disputes.

Acts 1970, ch. 577, § 2; T.C.A., § 52-311.

53-3-112. Inspection of products and establishments — Local regulations.

At times the commissioner deems proper, the commissioner shall cause to be inspected all places where dairy products or trade products are made, stored or served as food for pay, and all places where cows are kept by persons engaged in the sale of milk or cream, and shall require the correction of all unsanitary conditions and practices found in those places.

The governing authority of any municipal corporation, by ordinance, and any board of health, by regulation, may provide for the inspection of dairy products or trade products sold within its limits, dairy products or trade products plants and dairies and dairy herds kept for the production of milk or cream, and may prescribe the methods by which dairy products or trade products shall be handled, and may fix penalties for violation of ordinances and regulations; but no ordinance shall conflict in any way whatsoever with any law of this state, or any regulation promulgated by the commissioner, or interfere with any power or duty of the commissioner.

It is unlawful for any political subdivision, agency or department of any political subdivision in this state to impose, collect or accept an inspection fee upon or from any person or firm in the state by reason of the fact the person or firm is a producer, transporter or a processor of dairy products.

Any Grade A milk, milk products or dairy products produced in a political subdivision of the state shall be accepted without further inspection in all other political subdivisions of the state or their police jurisdictions, if the products are produced or pasteurized under regulations that are substantially equivalent to the latest United States public health service recommended Grade A pasteurized milk ordinance, and that have been awarded an acceptable milk sanitation rating made by a state department of agriculture laboratory certifying officer and milk sanitation rating officer certified by the United States public health service, and acceptable to the commissioner.

All ungraded milk, whether used for manufacturing purposes or otherwise, shall be accepted in any political subdivision of this state without further inspection if produced in accordance with the regulations promulgated by the commissioner, setting out minimum standards for operation of manufactured milk product plants.

Acts 1970, ch. 577, § 2; 1971, ch. 235, § 1; T.C.A., § 52-312.

53-3-113. Out-of-state products to meet requirements — Reciprocal inspection authorities and agreements.

It is required that all dairy or trade products shipped into this state from another state shall meet the sanitary standards, definitions and requirements of the law, and the rules and regulations promulgated by the commissioner.

The commissioner is authorized to establish acceptable reciprocal inspection authorities, interstate and intrastate, to properly enforce and administer this chapter in accordance with specifications and regulations adopted by the commissioner.

A reasonable fee shall be charged for all out-of-state inspections where reciprocal inspections are not available and cannot be negotiated.

Acts 1970, ch. 577, § 2; T.C.A., § 52-313.

53-3-114. Tagging and detention or destruction of products.

Whenever a duly authorized agent of the commissioner finds or has good cause to believe that any dairy product or trade product is sold or offered for sale by any person contrary to this chapter or regulations established as authorized in this chapter, a tag or appropriate marking shall be affixed to the product giving notice that the product is not being sold in accordance with this chapter, and that no person shall remove or dispose of the product by sale or otherwise until permission for removal or disposal is given by the commissioner or the commissioner's duly authorized agent.

In the event the product is unfit for human consumption, the commissioner or the commissioner's duly authorized agent may destroy it or authorize its disposal in a manner that is not a menace to public health.

Acts 1970, ch. 577, § 2; T.C.A., § 52-314.

53-3-115. Violation of this part a misdemeanor — Penalty.

Any violation of this part, either doing acts prohibited by this part or failing to do the acts required by this part, including regulations adopted in accordance with this part, is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1970, ch. 577, § 2; T.C.A., § 52-315; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

53-3-116. District attorney general to investigate and prosecute.

It is the duty of the district attorney general of the judicial district in which the commissioner reports a violation of this chapter, to investigate, prefer and prosecute charges if and when the district attorney general in the exercise of a sound discretion deems such action to be proper.

Acts 1970, ch. 577, § 2; T.C.A., § 52-316; modified.

Cross-References. Commissioner as prosecutor, § 53-3-203.

53-3-117. Disposition of funds.

All licenses, registration and inspection fees collected under this chapter shall be paid into the state treasury.

The fees are appropriated exclusively to the department to be used solely and specifically in carrying out this chapter.

Acts 1970, ch. 577, § 2; T.C.A., § 52-317.

53-3-118. Filing of a corporate surety bond by processors and distributors.

Any processor or distributor required to be licensed under, or whose product is required to be registered under, the dairy law of this state, compiled in this chapter, who acquires or receives, on consignment or otherwise, market or fluid milk from producers or cooperative associations composed of producers, shall file with the commissioner a corporate surety bond payable to the state, for the use and benefit of any aggrieved person and in the form prescribed by the commissioner and conditioned for the payment by the processor or distributor of all amounts due for market or fluid milk purchased or otherwise acquired from producers or cooperative associations of producers by the processor or distributor.

The bond shall be in an amount equal to the total purchases of market or fluid milk by the processor or distributor during the month of May of the preceding year, or if the processor or distributor was not engaged in business during the month of May of the preceding year, the bond shall be in an amount fixed by the commissioner. The bond required shall not, in any event, exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

Any producer or cooperative association of producers aggrieved by reason of a processor's or distributor's failure or refusal to pay any amount of money due for purchases of market or fluid milk shall have a right of action to sue in its own name upon the bond and against the surety in any court of law or equity of this state having jurisdiction.

The processor or distributor shall, at the time of paying the annual license or registration fees, file a corporate surety bond as provided in this section, which shall cover the term of the license or registration.

If any applicant for the license or registration fails to file the corporate surety bond as required in this section, the commissioner may refuse to issue or renew the applicant's license or registration, or the commissioner may issue the license or registration conditioned upon the applicant's paying cash for all the applicant's market or fluid milk purchases; provided, that the applicant furnishes the commissioner with the names and addresses of all persons from whom the applicant purchases milk.

Acts 2005, ch. 300, § 6.